Hawaii, session 2026, HB1364.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 281-31, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (j) to read as follows: "(j)  Class 10. Special license. (1)  A special license may be granted for the sale of liquor for a period not to exceed three days and pursuant to commission rule may be approved by the administrator for fundraising events by nonprofit organizations, political candidates, and political parties; provided that any registered educational or charitable nonprofit organization may sell liquors in their original packages for off-premises consumption; provided further that any social club granted tax-exempt status pursuant to section 501(c)(7) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, may sell wine from the social club's inventory to the club's members for off-premises consumption.  Of this class, there shall be the following kinds: (A)  General (includes all liquor except alcohol); (B)  Beer and wine; and (C)  Beer. Liquor sold under a class 10 license [shall] may be consumed on or off the premises. (2)  Notwithstanding any other section of this chapter to the contrary, the commission shall waive any hearings, fees, notarization of documents, submission of floor plans and other governmental clearances, and other requirements for the issuance of a class 10 license.  The class 10 license granted under this subsection for a fundraising event shall include the ability to auction off, at a live or silent auction, liquor in sealed or covered glass, ceramic, or metal containers or services that provide liquor.  No criminal history record check under section 281-53.5 or 846-2.7 or any other section of this chapter shall be required.  The commission may require proof of liquor liability insurance for the fundraising event and a current list of officers and directors if the applicant is a nonprofit organization." SECTION 2.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________